apertium-guj.guj.dix
	<!-- feminine -->
    <pardef n="છોકરી__n_f">
       <e><p><l>ી</l><r>ી<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ઓ</l><r>ી<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ી</l><r>ી<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="noun__post"/></e>
       <e><p><l>ઓ</l><r>ી<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="noun__post"/></e>
    </pardef>
	<!-- neuter -->
    <pardef n="છોકરું__n_nt"> 
       <e><p><l>ું</l><r>ું<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ા</l><r>ું<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ા</l><r>ું<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="noun__post"/></e>
       <e><p><l>ા</l><r>ું<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="noun__post"/></e>
    </pardef>

<!-- UnMarked nouns with declensional vowel terminations -->
	<!-- masculine -->
    <pardef n="વિચાર__n_m">
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ો</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="noun__post"/></e>
       <e><p><l>ો</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="noun__post"/></e>

       <e><p><l>ે</l><r>ો<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ે</l><r>ો<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
		<!-- the ones with a vowel ending -->
    <pardef n="રાજા/v__n_m">
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ઓ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="noun__post"/></e>
       <e><p><l>ઓ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="noun__post"/></e>
    </pardef>

	<!-- feminine -->
    <pardef n="બહેન__n_f">
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ો</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="noun__post"/></e>
       <e><p><l>ો</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="noun__post"/></e>
    </pardef>
		<!-- the ones with a vowel ending -->
    <pardef n="ભાષા/v__n_f">
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ઓ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="noun__post"/></e>
       <e><p><l>ઓ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="noun__post"/></e>
    </pardef>

	<!-- neuter -->
    <pardef n="ઘર__n_nt">
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ો</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="noun__post"/></e>
       <e><p><l>ો</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="noun__post"/></e>

       <e><p><l>ે</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ે</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

<!-- Other nouns, added previously 

    <pardef n="મૌલાના__n_m">
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ઓં</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="સદ/्__n_m">
      <e><p><l>્</l><r>્<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>્</l><r>્<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>્</l><r>્<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ોં</l><r>્<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="ઝડ__n_f">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ેં</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ોં</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="બલા__n_f">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>એઁ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ઓં</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="ખરચ__n_m">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>એ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ઓં</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
-->

    <e lm="ખરચ"><i>ખરચ</i><par n="ખરચ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ઝડ"><i>ઝડ</i><par n="ઝડ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="બલા"><i>બલા</i><par n="બલા__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="સદ्"><i>સદ</i><par n="સદ/्__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="મૌલાના"><i>મૌલાના</i><par n="મૌલાના__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="છોકરી"><i>છોકર</i><par n="છોકરી__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ટોપી"><i>ટોપ</i><par n="છોકરી__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="બાટલી"><i>બાટલ</i><par n="છોકરી__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="વીજળી"><i>વીજળ</i><par n="છોકરી__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ખુશી"><i>ખુશ</i><par n="છોકરી__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ગરમી"><i>ગરમ</i><par n="છોકરી__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="બિલાડી"><i>બિલાડ</i><par n="છોકરી__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="બારી"><i>બાર</i><par n="છોકરી__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ગણતરી"><i>ગણતર</i><par n="છોકરી__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ખુરશી"><i>ખુરશ</i><par n="છોકરી__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="છોકરું"><i>છોકર</i><par n="છોકરું__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="કારખાનું"><i>કારખાન</i><par n="છોકરું__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="બારણું"><i>બારણ</i><par n="છોકરું__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="માથું"><i>માથ</i><par n="છોકરું__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="વિચાર"><i>વિચાર</i><par n="વિચાર__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="વર્ષ"><i>વર્ષ</i><par n="વિચાર__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="સમય"><i>સમય</i><par n="વિચાર__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="જવાબ"><i>જવાબ</i><par n="વિચાર__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="અવાજ"><i>અવાજ</i><par n="વિચાર__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="હાથ"><i>હાથ</i><par n="વિચાર__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="લોક"><i>લોક</i><par n="વિચાર__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="મેજ"><i>મેજ</i><par n="વિચાર__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="પ્રશ્ન"><i>પ્રશ્ન</i><par n="વિચાર__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ખબર"><i>ખબર</i><par n="વિચાર__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ભોજન"><i>ભોજન</i><par n="વિચાર__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="રાજા"><i>રાજા</i><par n="રાજા/v__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ધોબી"><i>ધોબી</i><par n="રાજા/v__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="બહેન"><i>બહેન</i><par n="બહેન__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="બાબત"><i>બાબત</i><par n="બહેન__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="નિશાળ"><i>નિશાળ</i><par n="બહેન__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="આંખ"><i>આંખ</i><par n="બહેન__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="પ્રયત્ન"><i>પ્રયત્ન</i><par n="બહેન__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ભાષા"><i>ભાષા</i><par n="ભાષા/v__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="મા"><i>મા</i><par n="ભાષા/v__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="માતા"><i>માતા</i><par n="ભાષા/v__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="બા"><i>બા</i><par n="ભાષા/v__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="જગ્યા"><i>જગ્યા</i><par n="ભાષા/v__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ઘર"><i>ઘર</i><par n="ઘર__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="મેદાન"><i>મેદાન</i><par n="ઘર__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="વૃક્ષ"><i>વૃક્ષ</i><par n="ઘર__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ઝાડ"><i>ઝાડ</i><par n="ઘર__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="હવામાન"><i>હવામાન</i><par n="ઘર__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="બાળક"><i>બાળક</i><par n="ઘર__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="જાનવર"><i>જાનવર</i><par n="ઘર__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="પક્ષી"><i>પક્ષી</i><par n="ઘર__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ધ્યાન"><i>ધ્યાન</i><par n="ઘર__n_nt"/></e>
